New York, session 2025-2026, S6117.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new article 2 2-C to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 2-C 4 STRATEGIC STATE STOCKPILE 5 Section 297. State stockpile. 6 § 297. State stockpile. 1. The commissioner shall maintain a stockpile 7 or stockpiles of drugs, vaccines and other biological products, medical 8 devices and other supplies in such numbers, types and amounts as deter- 9 mined by the governor. The commissioner shall conduct an annual review 10 of the contents of such stockpile, including, but not limited to, non- 11 pharmaceutical supplies, and make necessary additions or modifications 12 to the contents of such stockpile based on such review. 13 2. The commissioner, in managing the stockpile pursuant to subdivision 14 one of this section, shall: 15 (a) consult with the workgroup for disease elimination and reduction 16 established pursuant to section two hundred sixty-six-a of this chapter; 17 (b) ensure that adequate procedures are followed with respect to such 18 stockpile for inventory management and accounting and for the physical 19 security of such stockpile; 20 (c) review and revise, as appropriate, the contents of such stockpile 21 on a regular basis to ensure that emerging threats and the potential 22 depletion of countermeasures currently in the stockpile are identified 23 and appropriately addressed, including through necessary replenishment; 24 and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10655-01-5 S. 6117 2 1 (d) devise plans for the effective and timely supply-chain management 2 of such stockpile, in consultation with the appropriate state and local 3 agencies and the public and private healthcare infrastructure. 4 3. The commissioner shall be responsible for the procurement of 5 supplies to be stored in such stockpile pursuant to this section, 6 including negotiating terms such as the quantity, production schedule, 7 and price of supplies, and entering into contracts and cooperative 8 agreements. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.